North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 4B. Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact. [Repealed]

§§ 113-60.11 through 113-60.15.

Recodified as Article 77 of Chapter 106,

G.S. 106-930

through 106-934, by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(t), effective July 1, 2011.

§§ 113-60.16 through 113-60.20.

Reserved for future codification purposes.